Indiana, session 2026, HB1203.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 15-20-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 5. Retired Animal Adoption
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "animal care facility" has the
meaning set forth in IC 6-9-39-1.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "research facility" means a
privately or government owned, leased, or operated:
(1) partnership;
(2) corporation;
(3) association;
(4) school;
(5) institution; or
(6) organization;
located in Indiana that uses animals for experimentation or
research or that tests chemical substances, ingredients, drugs,
medical devices, vaccines, products, or product formulations on
2026 IN 1203—LS 6294/DI 150


animals.
(b) The term includes a facility that carries out biomedical
research or educational research.
(c) The term does not include:
(1) a partnership;
(2) a corporation;
(3) an association;
(4) a school;
(5) an institution; or
(6) an organization;
that primarily provides veterinary services to an animal.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "retired animal" means a dog or
cat that:
(1) is confined at a research facility;
(2) has previously been used for research;
(3) is no longer required for research purposes; and
(4) the research facility's attending veterinarian deems
suitable for adoption.
Sec. 4. A research facility shall establish an adoption program
for retired animals confined at the research facility.
Sec. 5. A research facility shall offer a retired animal for
adoption to:
(1) an animal care facility; or
(2) an individual for private placement in the individual's
permanent home;
unless euthanizing the retired animal is required for health, safety,
or research reasons.
Sec. 6. A research facility may enter into a collaborative
agreement with one (1) or more animal care facilities for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 5 of this chapter.
Sec. 7. Once a retired animal is eligible for adoption, the
research facility shall do one (1) of the following:
(1) Offer to transfer ownership and custody of the retired
animal to an animal care facility to facilitate the transfer of
ownership and custody of the retired animal to an individual
for placement into the individual's permanent home.
(2) Offer to transfer ownership and custody of the retired
animal to an individual for private placement in the
individual's permanent home according to an arrangement
agreed to by the research facility and the individual adopting
the retired animal.
Sec. 8. A research facility that acts in good faith to transfer a
2026 IN 1203—LS 6294/DI 150


retired animal under section 7 of this chapter is immune from civil
liability for acts or circumstances related to or resulting from the
transfer of the retired animal.
SECTION 2. IC 34-30-2.1-195.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 195.2. IC 15-20-5-8 (Concerning
a research facility providing a retired animal to an animal care
facility or individual for adoption).
2026 IN 1203—LS 6294/DI 150